Hawaii statutes.
§480-3 Interpretation. This chapter
shall be construed in accordance with judicial interpretations of similar
federal antitrust statutes, except that lawsuits by indirect purchasers may be
brought as provided in this chapter. [L 1965, c 129, pt of §1; Supp, §205A-1.2;
HRS §480-3; am L 1981, c 91, §1; am L 1987, c 274, §3]

Law Journals and Reviews

Hawaii's Section Five of the FTC Act: The Ubiquitous
Antitrust Law. 6 HBJ 5.

Misrepresentation and Deception Under Section 480-2 of the
Hawaii Revised Statutes. 10 HBJ 69.

Case Notes

Substantive standards intended to be same as §16 of Clayton
Act. 518 F.2d 913.

Courts must refer to judicial interpretation of §5(a)(1) of
the Federal Trade Commission Act, 15 U.S.C. §45(a)(1) before applying §480-2.
849 F.2d 388.

Relation of federal regulation and possible antitrust
exemption to state laws construed. 460 F. Supp. 1359.

Legislative history clearly indicates that state laws are to
be interpreted and construed in harmony with analogous federal antitrust laws.
513 F. Supp. 726.

Federal statutes and decisions are to be used as guides. 63
H. 289, 627 P.2d 260.

Cited: 332 F.3d 600; 168 F. Supp. 2d 1180.

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next